Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-634
Improvements; real estate owned by minor or protected person; petition; guardian or conservator may sign.

If, in any city of the first class, there shall be any real estate of any minor or protected person, the guardian or conservator of such minor or protected person may sign any petition referred to by law, and such signature shall have like force and effect as that of other property owners.

Laws 1907, c. 13, § 1, p. 111;

R.S.1913, § 4928;

C.S.1922, § 4096;

C.S.1929, § 16-625;

R.S.1943, § 16-634;

Laws 1975, LB 481, § 3;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 100.